Louisiana, session 2026, HB978.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:168(B)(1)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§168. Judicial district indigent defender fund
* * *
B.(1)(a) Every court of original criminal jurisdiction, except in the town of
Jonesville, in the city of Plaquemine, and in mayors' courts in municipalities having
a population of less than five nine thousand, shall remit the following special costs
to the district indigent defender fund for the following violations, under state statute
as well as under parish or municipal ordinance, except a parking violation. Except
as provided in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, the sum of forty-five dollars shall
be assessed in cases in which a defendant is convicted after a trial, a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere, or after forfeiting bond and shall be in addition to all other fines,
costs, or forfeitures imposed.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.